test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AW_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲áw - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AW_STEM_2

     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áawaa
     sg̲áw+V+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲áawaan
     sg̲áw+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲áawaas
     sg̲áw+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áawaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲áaw'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲áaw'ahlanggan
     sg̲áw+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áaw'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲áaw'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲áawaa'ahlang
     sg̲áw+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲áawaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲áw+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲áawaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+REFLEXIVE: sg̲áaw'ahl
